Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Urban Development
§ 15-9-120.
Taxes upon property; authorized division thereof.

Any urban renewal plan may contain a provision that taxes, if any, levied upon taxable property in an urban renewal project each year by or for the benefit of a municipality in the state shall be divided as follows:

That portion of the taxes which would be produced by the rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of the taxing agencies upon the total sum of the assessed value of the taxable property in the urban renewal project as shown upon the assessment roll used in connection with the taxation of the property by the taxing agency, last equalized prior to the effective date of the urban renewal project shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies as taxes by or for those taxing agencies on all other property are paid (for the purpose of allocating taxes by or for any taxing agency which did not include the territory in the urban renewal project on the effective date of the project but which territory had been annexed or otherwise included after the effective date, the assessment of the county last equalized on the project shall be used in determining the assessed valuation on the taxable property in the project on the effective date); and

That portion of the levied taxes each year in excess of the amount specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund of the participating municipality or urban renewal agency to pay the principal and interest on loaned money advanced to, or any indebtedness incurred by the municipality or urban renewal agency. Unless the total assessed valuation of the taxable property in an urban renewal project exceeds the total assessed value of the taxable property in the project as shown by the last equalized assessment roll referred to in paragraph (a)(i) of this section, all of the taxes levied and collected upon the taxable property in the urban renewal project shall be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies. When any loans, advances and indebtedness, if any, and interest have been paid in full, all monies thereafter received from taxes upon the taxable property in the urban renewal project shall be paid into the funds of the various taxing agencies as taxes on all other property are paid.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-512; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-121; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-9-121.
Taxes upon property; when pledging allowed.

In any urban renewal plan or in proceedings for the advance of monies or making of loans or the incurring of any indebtedness by the municipality or agency to finance or refinance in whole or in part the urban renewal project, the portion of the taxes specified in W.S. 15-9-120(a)(ii) may be irrevocably pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on those loans or advances or that indebtedness.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 22: W.S. 1957, § 15.1-513; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-122; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-122.
Bonds; provisions inapplicable; tax exemption.

Revenue bonds issued under this chapter:

Do not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction;

Are not subject to the provisions of any other law or charter relating to the authorization, issuance or sale of bonds.

Bonds issued under this chapter are for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, are exempt from all taxes.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-514; Laws 1969, ch. 157, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-123; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-123.
Bonds; resolution or ordinance; characteristics.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the local governing body. The bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series and shall bear the date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at the time or times, bear interest at the rate or rates, be in the denomination or denominations and form, either with or without coupon or registered, carry conversion or registration privileges, have the rank or priority, be executed in a manner and payable in a medium of payment at the place or places, be subject to the terms of redemption (with or without premium), be secured in the manner and have other characteristics as may be provided by the resolution or ordinance or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-515; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 12; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-124; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 15-9-124.
Bonds; sale or exchange.

Bonds may be sold at not less than par at public sales held after notice published prior to the sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation and in any other medium of publication as the municipality determines or may be exchanged for other bonds on the basis of par. However, the bonds may be sold to the federal government at a private sale at not less than par. If less than all of the authorized principal amount on the bonds is sold to the federal government, the balance may be sold at private sale at not less than par at an interest cost to the municipality or not to exceed the interest cost to the municipality of the portion of the bonds sold to the federal government.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-516; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-125; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-125.
Bonds; signatures and negotiability.

If any of the public officials of the municipality whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons issued under this chapter cease to be officials before the delivery of the bonds, the signatures are valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the officials had remained in office until the delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are fully negotiable.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-517; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-126; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-126.
Bonds; recitation thereon.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this chapter or the security therefor, the bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the municipality in connection with an urban renewal project, as defined in W.S.

15-9-103

is conclusively deemed to have been issued for that purpose and the project is conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and carried out in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-518; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-127; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-127.
General obligation bonds; purposes; authorization; approval; characteristics; other provisions unaffected.

In addition to the authority to issue bonds pursuant to W.S.

15-9-119

, any municipality may issue general obligation bonds for the urban renewal purposes specified in subsection (b) of this section and subject to the requirements thereof and the requirements of the constitution and any other applicable laws.

General obligation bonds issued by a municipality for the purposes of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of any urban renewal project and related activities of a municipality, its board or commission, or its agency under this chapter shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the local governing body and shall be approved by a vote of the people residing in the issuing governmental unit at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

The bonds shall bear any characteristics as may be provided by the resolution or ordinance or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto, including the characteristics specified in W.S.

15-9-123

. Nothing in this section limits or otherwise adversely affects any other section of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-519; Laws 1969, ch. 157, § 1; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 13; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-10-128, 15-10-134; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 15-9-128.
Investment of funds in bonds authorized; duty of care.

Anyone carrying on a banking or investment business or an insurance business and all fiduciaries may legally invest any monies or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality pursuant to this chapter.

It is the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations.

Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-520; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-129; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1998, ch. 50, § 1.

§ 15-9-129.
Exemption of property from execution; exception.

All property of a municipality or agency, including funds owned or held by it for the purposes of this chapter, are exempt from levy and sale by virtue of any execution. No execution or other judicial process shall issue against the property nor shall judgment against a municipality or agency be a charge or lien upon the property. The provisions of this section do not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given pursuant to this chapter by a municipality or agency on its rents, fees, grants or revenues from urban renewal projects.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-521; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-130; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-130.
Exemption of property from taxation; termination thereof.

The property of a municipality or agency acquired or held for the purposes of this chapter, is public property used for essential public and governmental purposes. The property is exempt from all taxes of the municipality, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof. However, the tax exemption terminates if the municipality or agency sells, leases or otherwise disposes of the property in any urban renewal area to a purchaser or lessee which is not a public body entitled to tax exemption for the property.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-522; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-131; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-131.
Powers of municipality, public body in aiding project.

To aid in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project and related activities authorized by this chapter located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body or municipality, upon terms and with or without consideration as it determines, may:

Dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to a municipality;

Incur the entire expense of any public improvements it makes in exercising the powers granted in this section;

Do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of an urban renewal plan;

Lend, grant or contribute funds to a municipality;

Enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with the federal government, a municipality or any other public body respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban renewal project and related activities;

Borrow money and apply for and accept any form of financial assistance from any source;

Furnish any public buildings and public facilities or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

Furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways or other places;

Plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations; and

Cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the municipality.

If at any time title to or possession of any urban renewal project is held by any public body or governmental agency, other than the municipality which is authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out or administration of urban renewal projects and related activities (including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America), the provisions of the agreements referred to in this section inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by the public body or governmental agency.

Any sale, conveyance, lease or agreement pursuant to this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement or public bidding.

As used in this section, “municipality” includes an urban renewal agency vested with all of the urban renewal project powers pursuant to W.S.

15-9-133

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, §§ 32, 33; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-523, 15.1-524; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-10-132, 15-10-133; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-132.
Instruments presumed properly executed.

Any instrument executed by a municipality and purporting to convey the right, title or interest in any property under this chapter is conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with the provisions hereof insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees or transferees of the property is concerned.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-526; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-135; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-133.
Exercise of powers; delegation and scope thereof; exceptions.

A municipality may itself exercise its urban renewal powers as specified in this chapter.

As used in this section, “urban renewal powers,” when applied to their exercise by the urban renewal agency, include the rights, powers, functions and duties of a municipality set forth in this chapter, except the following:

The determination of an area to be a slum or blighted area or combination thereof and the designation of an area as appropriate for an urban renewal project;

Approval of urban renewal plans and modifications thereof;

General neighborhood renewal plans and communitywide plans or programs for urban renewal;

Establishment of a general plan for the locality as a whole;

The power to formulate a workable program under W.S.

15-9-105

.

A municipality shall not delegate to an urban renewal agency or a board or commission, the power to acquire by condemnation real property within the boundaries of an urban renewal area.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-527; Laws 1971, ch. 241, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-136; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 139, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a); in (c) substituted “shall not” for “by resolution, may” following “a municipality.”

§ 15-9-134.
Agency; creation; board of commissioners; appointment; compensation; actions and procedure; removal.

There is created in each municipality a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “urban renewal agency” of the municipality. The urban renewal agency shall not exercise its powers under this chapter until or unless the local governing body has made the finding prescribed in W.S.

15-9-106

and has elected to have urban renewal powers exercised by an urban renewal agency as provided in W.S.

15-9-133

.

The mayor, by and with the consent and advice of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of five (5) commissioners of the urban renewal agency selected on the basis of their interest in and knowledge of community planning, urban renewal and business management. Any person may be appointed as commissioner if he resides within the area of operation of the agency (which shall have the same bounds or limits as the area of operation of the municipality) and is otherwise eligible for appointment under this chapter. The original appointment of commissioners shall be as follows: one (1) for a term of one (1) year; one (1) for a term of two (2) years; one (1) for a term of three (3) years; one (1) for a term of four (4) years; and one (1) for a term of five (5) years. Thereafter each appointment shall be for a term of five (5) years.

Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality and the certificate is conclusive evidence of the commissioner’s due and proper appointment.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but is entitled to necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of his duties. No commissioner or other officer of any urban renewal agency, board or commission exercising powers pursuant to this chapter shall hold any other public municipal office for which compensation is received.

The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners constitute a quorum for all purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws require a larger number. Annually, at the first meeting, the board of commissioners shall elect its officers. Each officer shall hold office for a term of one (1) year and until his successor is elected and qualified.

A commissioner may be removed from office for inefficiency, neglect of duty or misconduct in office only after:

A hearing;

He has been given a copy of the charges at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing; and

He has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-528; Laws 1971, ch. 228, § 1; 1975, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-137; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-135.
Agency; staff.

An agency may employ an executive director, technical experts and any other agents and employees it requires and determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. An agency may also employ or retain its own counsel and legal staff.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-528; Laws 1971, ch. 228, § 1; 1975, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-137; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-136.
Agency; annual reports.

An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall file with the local governing body on or before May 31 of each year a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year. The report shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income and operating expenses as of the end of that calendar year. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the community a notice to the effect that the report has been filed with the municipality and is available for inspection during business hours in the office of the clerk of the municipality and in the office of the agency.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-528; Laws 1971, ch. 228, § 1; 1975, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-137; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-137.
Voluntary conflicts of interest prohibited; disclosure of involuntary conflicts; violation.

No public official or employee of a municipality, or board or commission thereof, and no commissioner or employee of an urban renewal agency vested by a municipality with urban renewal project powers under W.S.

15-9-133

shall voluntarily acquire any personal interest, direct or indirect, in any urban renewal project, or in any property included or planned to be included in any urban renewal project of that municipality or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with that urban renewal project. If the acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed in writing to the local governing body, and the disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes thereof. If any official, commissioner or employee presently owns or controls, or owned or controlled within the preceding two (2) years, any interest, directly or indirectly, in any property which he knows is included or planned to be included in any urban renewal project, he shall immediately disclose this fact in writing to the local governing body. The disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body, and no such official, commissioner or employee shall participate in any action by the municipality, or board or commission thereof, or urban renewal agency, affecting the property. Any disclosure required to be made by this section to the local governing body shall concurrently be made to an urban renewal agency which has been vested with urban renewal project powers by the municipality pursuant to this chapter. Any violation of the provisions of this section constitutes misconduct in office.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-529; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-138; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.